Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.256

Competitive bids—Multiple awards for road maintenance materials.

A county when calling for competitive bids for the procurement of road maintenance materials may award to multiple bidders for the same commodity when the bid specifications provide for the factors of haul distance to be included in the determination of which vendor is truly the lowest price to the county. The county may readvertise for additional bidders and vendors if it deems it necessary in the public interest.

[ 1991 c 363 s 61.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.